District of Columbia statutes.
4-1501.06

Submission of positions of covered child or youth services providers subject to criminal background checks.

(a)

Within 30 days of December 1, 2004, each District government agency shall submit to the Mayor the positions it has designated as subject to the criminal background check requirements of this chapter, including those of private entities that contract with the District to provide direct services to children or youth and that are under the contractual purview of the agency.

(b)

Each District government agency shall submit an updated list of the positions subject to the criminal background check requirements of this chapter no later than December 1 of each year.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 206, 52 DCR 2331
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 206 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).
This section is referenced in § 4-1501.07.